Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 12.1 School Administrators’ Rights

16-12.1-1.
Legislative purpose.

The general assembly recognizes that administrators are not members of teacher collective bargaining units and, therefore, are not protected by the terms of teacher bargaining agreements. While clearly intending neither to interfere with the discretion of school committees to choose those who shall administer local schools nor to grant tenure to school administrators, the general assembly deems it necessary to the orderly and effective functioning of public education to inform school administrators of the bases or reasons for their suspension, dismissal, or nonrenewal of their employment relationship, and to afford administrators an opportunity to be heard before the school committee. Full disclosure of the bases or reasons for suspension, dismissal, or nonrenewal and the hearing which may follow, while providing administrators and school committees a meaningful hedge against mistaken or impermissible actions as well as an opportunity to question and confront those individuals whose judgment or allegations furnish the basis for the actions taken, are ultimately intended to erase harmful innuendo from any suspension, dismissal, or nonrenewal of an administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 291, § 1.

16-12.1-2.
“Administrator” defined.

The term “administrator” as used in this chapter applies only to full time, certified professionals having the authority in the interest of a local or regional school district or school within a district to direct, supervise, advise, or manage; provided, however, the term “administrator” does not include superintendents of schools or assistant superintendents of schools. An “administrator” within a teacher bargaining unit, protected by the terms of a regional or local school committee teacher collective bargaining agreement, shall not be protected by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1.

16-12.1-2.1.
Termination of administrator.

An administrator shall only be terminated for just cause including but not limited to declining enrollment or consolidation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 291, § 2.

16-12.1-3.
Notice required — Hearing.

Prior to taking final action dismissing or not renewing the employment of an administrator, and subsequent to suspending the employment of an administrator, a regional or local school committee shall provide the affected administrator with: (1) a concise, clear, written statement, privately communicated, of the bases or reasons for the suspension, dismissal, or nonrenewal, and (2) notification of the right of the administrator to a prompt hearing, which shall be at the election of the administrator, and the right to be represented by counsel at the hearing. Upon the request of a hearing by the administrator, prompt notification stating the time and place of the hearing shall be given. The time and place set for the hearing shall allow sufficient opportunity to the administrator for preparation without undue delay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1.

16-12.1-4.
Conduct of hearing.

The hearing shall be held before a quorum of the school committee. The administrator shall have the opportunity to present and cross-examine witnesses. Testimony shall be taken under oath and a full stenographic record shall be kept.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1.

16-12.1-5.
Decision.

Within a reasonable time, not to exceed thirty (30) days, after the conclusion of the hearing, the school committee shall render a concise, clear, written decision. The findings and conclusions in the decision shall be based exclusively on evidence received at the hearing or on reasonable inferences drawn from the evidence. A copy of the decision shall be promptly supplied to the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1.

16-12.1-6.
Appeals.

An administrator aggrieved by a final decision of a school committee may obtain review under the provisions of chapter 39 of this title by petitioning the commissioner of elementary and secondary education within ten (10) days of receipt of the decision. When an appeal is taken, the school board shall forward a copy of the complete record of the case to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 372, § 1.